Washington statutes.
RCW 15.17.190

Inspections—Right of access—Samples—Denial of access—Search warrants.

The director may enter during business hours and inspect any facility where any fruits or vegetables are processed, stored, packed, delivered for shipment, loaded, shipped, being transported, or sold, and may inspect all fruits or vegetables and the containers and the equipment in that facility. The director may take for inspection representative samples of fruits or vegetables and containers as may be necessary to determine whether or not this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter have been violated. If the director is denied access to any facility, the director may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for a search warrant authorizing access to the facility. The court may upon such application issue a search warrant for the purpose requested.

[ 1998 c 154 s 12; 1963 c 122 s 19.]